Massachusetts, session 194th, H5278.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary the
Massachusetts Aeronautics Division (“The Division”) shall collect and post annually on its
website all noise reports and complaints made to Beverly Regional Airport (BVY) between April
1 and October 1.
For the purposes of this section, “noise complaint” shall refer to any complaint or report
of excessive noise and shall include the day, date and hour of the week it occurred made via
airport website, App, telephone, voicemail, email, written letter or in-person visit to the Airport
or to a Commissioner by any resident.
This data shall be collected by The Division no later than 14 days following the end of
each month and posted in a readily accessible section of the Division’s public website no later
than 20 days following the end each month. The data shall be posted and shall remain on the
website in perpetuity.
of 3

SECTION 2. The Division shall collect from the BVY Tower the number and time of
day of all so-called “Touch and Go” operations between April 1 and October 1. This data shall
be collected no later than 14 days following the end of each month and shall be posted in a
readily accessible section of the BVY public website no later than 20 days following the end
each month and shall remain on the website in perpetuity.
The Administrator of The Division shall share all noise data collected with the House
and Senate Chairs of the Joint Committee on Transportation and with the Secretary of
Transportation by December 31 of each year.
SECTION 3. At the request of at least two commissioners of the BVY Regional
Airport, the Airport Commission shall convene a public meeting devoted to noise reports at
which members of the public may ask questions of Commission Members and the Airport
Manager, who shall, to the best of their ability, answer the questions.
SECTION 4. It shall be the responsibility of The Division to provide annually to the
BVY Airport Manager and Commissioners guidance in the development, implementation and
oversight of a policy, commonly referred to as Good Neighbor or Fly Neighborly policy,
designed to facilitate an understanding among flight school owners, flight school instructors and
student pilots and all pilots of the airport of the noise impact of “Touch and Go” operations on
neighbors within three miles of runways. Said Good Neighbor policy guidance shall include but
not be limited to providing airports with a sample written policy, providing a written copy of the
policy to be given to all student pilots and pilots to be posted visibly in several locations,
including pilot areas, suggested steps for informing all airport tenants of the policy, and
of 3

providing a social media toolkit for publicizing said policy to all airport tenants, pilots, student
pilots and Commissioners.
SECTION 5. Each applicant for a badge at BVY shall be provided with a copy of the
Good Neighbor Policy.
This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
of 3